Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.aff
FLAG num
SFX 868 N 1
SFX 868 0 ergents .

SFX 869 N 1
SFX 869 0 erians .

SFX 870 N 1
SFX 870 0 erin .

SFX 871 N 1
SFX 871 0 erington .

SFX 872 N 1
SFX 872 0 erLines .

SFX 873 N 1
SFX 873 0 erMatrix .

SFX 874 N 1
SFX 874 0 ernell .

SFX 875 N 1
SFX 875 0 Error .

SFX 876 N 1
SFX 876 0 ers .

SFX 877 N 1
SFX 877 0 ersonDarlingTest .

SFX 878 N 1
SFX 878 0 ert .

SFX 879 N 1
SFX 879 0 erton .

SFX 880 N 1
SFX 880 0 erView .

SFX 881 N 1
SFX 881 0 erWait .

SFX 882 N 1
SFX 882 0 es .

SFX 883 N 1
SFX 883 0 est .

SFX 884 N 1
SFX 884 0 Estimator .

SFX 885 N 1
SFX 885 0 EstimatorFunction .

SFX 886 N 1
SFX 886 0 estMatch .

SFX 887 N 1
SFX 887 0 estPath .

SFX 888 N 1
SFX 888 0 estPathFunction .

SFX 889 N 1
SFX 889 0 estPathSpanningTree .

SFX 890 N 1
SFX 890 0 Eta .

SFX 891 N 1
SFX 891 0 Eta1 .

SFX 892 N 1
SFX 892 0 Eta2 .

SFX 893 N 1
SFX 893 0 Eta3 .

SFX 894 N 1
SFX 894 0 etable .

SFX 895 N 1
SFX 895 0 ete .

SFX 896 N 1
SFX 896 0 eteAnomalies .

SFX 897 N 1
SFX 897 0 eteBorderComponents .

SFX 898 N 1
SFX 898 0 eteCases .

SFX 899 N 1
SFX 899 0 eteChannel .

SFX 900 N 1
SFX 900 0 eteCloudExpression .

SFX 901 N 1
SFX 901 0 eteContents .

SFX 902 N 1
SFX 902 0 eteCycle .

SFX 903 N 1
SFX 903 0 eteDirectory .

SFX 904 N 1
SFX 904 0 eteDuplicates .

SFX 905 N 1
SFX 905 0 eteDuplicatesBy .

SFX 906 N 1
SFX 906 0 eteEdge .

SFX 907 N 1
SFX 907 0 eteFile .

SFX 908 N 1
SFX 908 0 eteFromTableau .

SFX 909 N 1
SFX 909 0 eteMissing .

SFX 910 N 1
SFX 910 0 eteObject .

SFX 911 N 1
SFX 911 0 etePermissionsKey .

SFX 912 N 1
SFX 912 0 eteSearchIndex .

SFX 913 N 1
SFX 913 0 eteSmallComponents .

SFX 914 N 1
SFX 914 0 eteStopwords .

SFX 915 N 1
SFX 915 0 eteVertex .

SFX 916 N 1
SFX 916 0 eteWithContents .

SFX 917 N 1
SFX 917 0 etic .

SFX 918 N 1
SFX 918 0 etionWarning .

SFX 919 N 1
SFX 919 0 etti .

SFX 920 N 1
SFX 920 0 eType .

SFX 921 N 1
SFX 921 0 EulerianCycle .

SFX 922 N 1
SFX 922 0 EvaluationDuplicate .

SFX 923 N 1
SFX 923 0 EvaluationFunction .

SFX 924 N 1
SFX 924 0 EvaluationNotebook .

SFX 925 N 1
SFX 925 0 EvaluationTimeout .

SFX 926 N 1
SFX 926 0 Evaluator .

SFX 927 N 1
SFX 927 0 Event .

SFX 928 N 1
SFX 928 0 EventActions .

SFX 929 N 1
SFX 929 0 ewton .

SFX 930 N 1
SFX 930 0 ewtons .

SFX 931 N 1
SFX 931 0 Excess .

SFX 932 N 1
SFX 932 0 Execute .

SFX 933 N 1
SFX 933 0 Exists .

SFX 934 N 1
SFX 934 0 ExistsQ .

SFX 935 N 1
SFX 935 0 Expand .

SFX 936 N 1
SFX 936 0 Expandable .

SFX 937 N 1
SFX 937 0 expansion .

SFX 938 N 1
SFX 938 0 Exponent .

SFX 939 N 1
SFX 939 0 Export .

SFX 940 N 1
SFX 940 0 ExportByteArray .

SFX 941 N 1
SFX 941 0 ExportLibrary .

SFX 942 N 1
SFX 942 0 ExportString .

SFX 943 N 1
SFX 943 0 Expression .

SFX 944 N 1
SFX 944 0 ExpressionPacket .

SFX 945 N 1
SFX 945 0 ExpSeries .

SFX 946 N 1
SFX 946 0 ExpSeriesCoefficient .

SFX 947 N 1
SFX 947 0 Extension .

SFX 948 N 1
SFX 948 0 ExternalEvaluators .

SFX 949 N 1
SFX 949 0 Extract .

SFX 950 N 1
SFX 950 0 ExtraFactors .

SFX 951 N 1
SFX 951 0 ExtraTerms .

SFX 952 N 1
SFX 952 0 f .

SFX 953 N 1
SFX 953 0 F1 .

SFX 954 N 1
SFX 954 0 face .

SFX 955 N 1
SFX 955 0 Face .

SFX 956 N 1
SFX 956 0 FaceGridsStyle .

SFX 957 N 1
SFX 957 0 Faces .

SFX 958 N 1
SFX 958 0 Factor .

SFX 959 N 1
SFX 959 0 Factors .

SFX 960 N 1
SFX 960 0 fair .

SFX 961 N 1
SFX 961 0 False .

SFX 962 N 1
SFX 962 0 Family .

SFX 963 N 1
SFX 963 0 fan .

SFX 964 N 1
SFX 964 0 fans .

SFX 965 N 1
SFX 965 0 farad .

SFX 966 N 1
SFX 966 0 farads .

SFX 967 N 1
SFX 967 0 ferencesDirectory .

SFX 968 N 1
SFX 968 0 Fetch .

SFX 969 N 1
SFX 969 0 FetchAsynchronous .

SFX 970 N 1
SFX 970 0 fiability .

SFX 971 N 1
SFX 971 0 fic .

SFX 972 N 1
SFX 972 0 Field .

SFX 973 N 1
SFX 973 0 FieldBox .

SFX 974 N 1
SFX 974 0 FieldBoxOptions .

SFX 975 N 1
SFX 975 0 FieldClassNumber .

SFX 976 N 1
SFX 976 0 FieldDiscriminant .

SFX 977 N 1
SFX 977 0 FieldFormat .

SFX 978 N 1
SFX 978 0 FieldFundamentalUnits .

SFX 979 N 1
SFX 979 0 FieldHintStyle .

SFX 980 N 1
SFX 980 0 FieldIntegralBasis .

SFX 981 N 1
SFX 981 0 FieldNormRepresentatives .

SFX 982 N 1
SFX 982 0 FieldRegulator .

SFX 983 N 1
SFX 983 0 FieldRootsOfUnity .

SFX 984 N 1
SFX 984 0 FieldSignature .

SFX 985 N 1
SFX 985 0 FigureChart .

SFX 986 N 1
SFX 986 0 File .

SFX 987 N 1
SFX 987 0 FileDate .

SFX 988 N 1
SFX 988 0 FileLoadingContext .

SFX 989 N 1
SFX 989 0 FileName .

SFX 990 N 1
SFX 990 0 Fill .

SFX 991 N 1
SFX 991 0 Filling .

SFX 992 N 1
SFX 992 0 Filter .

SFX 993 N 1
SFX 993 0 FilterKernel .

SFX 994 N 1
SFX 994 0 FilterModel .

SFX 995 N 1
SFX 995 0 Find .

SFX 996 N 1
SFX 996 0 FindRemote .

SFX 997 N 1
SFX 997 0 First .

SFX 998 N 1
SFX 998 0 FirstScan .

SFX 999 N 1
SFX 999 0 FirstTraversal .

SFX 1000 N 1
SFX 1000 0 Fit .

SFX 1001 N 1
SFX 1001 0 Fixed .

SFX 1002 N 1
SFX 1002 0 Flag .

SFX 1003 N 1
SFX 1003 0 Flatten .

SFX 1004 N 1
SFX 1004 0 FlushImagePacket .

SFX 1005 N 1
SFX 1005 0 Fold .

SFX 1006 N 1
SFX 1006 0 FoldList .

SFX 1007 N 1
SFX 1007 0 folium .

SFX 1008 N 1
SFX 1008 0 Font .

SFX 1009 N 1
SFX 1009 0 FontProperties .

SFX 1010 N 1
SFX 1010 0 Forecast .

SFX 1011 N 1
SFX 1011 0 form .

SFX 1012 N 1
SFX 1012 0 Form .

SFX 1013 N 1
SFX 1013 0 Format .

SFX 1014 N 1
SFX 1014 0 Formats .

SFX 1015 N 1
SFX 1015 0 FormatType .

SFX 1016 N 1
SFX 1016 0 FormatTypeForStyle .

SFX 1017 N 1
SFX 1017 0 FormData .

SFX 1018 N 1
SFX 1018 0 FormFormatTypes .

SFX 1019 N 1
SFX 1019 0 FormPacket .

SFX 1020 N 1
SFX 1020 0 Forms .

SFX 1021 N 1
SFX 1021 0 Formula .

SFX 1022 N 1
SFX 1022 0 ForsytheTest .

SFX 1023 N 1
SFX 1023 0 Forward .

SFX 1024 N 1
SFX 1024 0 Fourier .

SFX 1025 N 1
SFX 1025 0 FourierCosTransform .

SFX 1026 N 1
SFX 1026 0 FourierSequenceTransform .

SFX 1027 N 1
SFX 1027 0 FourierSinTransform .

SFX 1028 N 1
SFX 1028 0 FourierTransform .

SFX 1029 N 1
SFX 1029 0 Frame .

SFX 1030 N 1
SFX 1030 0 FrameColor .

SFX 1031 N 1
SFX 1031 0 FrameLabelMargins .

SFX 1032 N 1
SFX 1032 0 FrameLabels .

SFX 1033 N 1
SFX 1033 0 FrameMargins .

SFX 1034 N 1
SFX 1034 0 FrameStyle .

SFX 1035 N 1
SFX 1035 0 FrameTicksStyle .

SFX 1036 N 1
SFX 1036 0 free .

SFX 1037 N 1
SFX 1037 0 FreeQ .

SFX 1038 N 1
SFX 1038 0 frequencies .

SFX 1039 N 1
SFX 1039 0 frequency .

SFX 1040 N 1
SFX 1040 0 Frequency .

SFX 1041 N 1
SFX 1041 0 FrequencyConstant .

SFX 1042 N 1
SFX 1042 0 FrequencyData .

SFX 1043 N 1
SFX 1043 0 From .

SFX 1044 N 1
SFX 1044 0 FromAbove .

SFX 1045 N 1
SFX 1045 0 FromBoth .

SFX 1046 N 1
SFX 1046 0 FromLeft .

SFX 1047 N 1
SFX 1047 0 Front .

SFX 1048 N 1
SFX 1048 0 FrontEnd .

SFX 1049 N 1
SFX 1049 0 FrontEndInteractionPacket .

SFX 1050 N 1
SFX 1050 0 FrontEndOptionsDataPacket .

SFX 1051 N 1
SFX 1051 0 FullEqual .

SFX 1052 N 1
SFX 1052 0 function .

SFX 1053 N 1
SFX 1053 0 Function .

SFX 1054 N 1
SFX 1054 0 FunctionInspectorPacket .

SFX 1055 N 1
SFX 1055 0 functions .

SFX 1056 N 1
SFX 1056 0 Functions .

SFX 1057 N 1
SFX 1057 0 FunctionScaling .

SFX 1058 N 1
SFX 1058 0 FundamentalCycles .

SFX 1059 N 1
SFX 1059 0 fusene .

SFX 1060 N 1
SFX 1060 0 g .

SFX 1061 N 1
SFX 1061 0 G .

SFX 1062 N 1
SFX 1062 0 gain .

SFX 1063 N 1
SFX 1063 0 Gamma .

SFX 1064 N 1
SFX 1064 0 GammaDistribution .

SFX 1065 N 1
SFX 1065 0 GammaRegularized .

SFX 1066 N 1
SFX 1066 0 Gauge .

SFX 1067 N 1
SFX 1067 0 GaussianDistribution .

SFX 1068 N 1
SFX 1068 0 GaussianFilter .

SFX 1069 N 1
SFX 1069 0 GCD .

SFX 1070 N 1
SFX 1070 0 gè .

SFX 1071 N 1
SFX 1071 0 ged .

SFX 1072 N 1
SFX 1072 0 geman .

SFX 1073 N 1
SFX 1073 0 GeneratingFunction .

SFX 1074 N 1
SFX 1074 0 Genus .

SFX 1075 N 1
SFX 1075 0 GeoGraphics .

SFX 1076 N 1
SFX 1076 0 GeoLocation .

SFX 1077 N 1
SFX 1077 0 GeometricConjectures .

SFX 1078 N 1
SFX 1078 0 GeometricTransform .

SFX 1079 N 1
SFX 1079 0 GeoPosition .

SFX 1080 N 1
SFX 1080 0 get .

SFX 1081 N 1
SFX 1081 0 GF .

SFX 1082 N 1
SFX 1082 0 ging .

SFX 1083 N 1
SFX 1083 0 Goal .

SFX 1084 N 1
SFX 1084 0 GolayMatrix .

SFX 1085 N 1
SFX 1085 0 gon .

SFX 1086 N 1
SFX 1086 0 gonal .
