Contents/Resources/Wolfram Player.app/Contents/SystemFiles/Components/SpellingData/SpellingDictionaries/TechTerms.dic
AbsoluteCorrelation/1053
Accuracy/1083
And/877,1897,1898,1905,1925,1958
Appell/953
ArcLength/958
AspectRatio/1001
Association/1013,1544,1558,1869,2220
Bessel/994,1192,1386,1403,1404,1405,1406,1407,1408,1409,2391,2399,2402,2403
Blank/1012,1325,1684,2035
blog/1071,1082,1994
Brown/1022,1205,1537,1694
cata/391,544,545,1059
Catch/873
CentralMoment/1073
ChartElementData/1053
Clock/1066
Colon/1012
ColorData/1053
Commonest/992
Complex/882,935,1300,1379,1515,1816,1817,1970
condylos/882
conv/868
Covariance/885,1053,1558,1559,1561,1562,1597
CoxModel/1000
cryptarithm/917
Cumulant/1073
daktylos/882
Decrypt/986
Dedekind/890
Depth/998,999
Derivative/992
dhanush/882
diaulos/882
dichas/882
dimi/169,170,174,206,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1793,1794,1879,1880,1883,1884,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
dolichos/882
Duffin/1060
Echo/1053
eigen/413,416,937,1011,1038,1039,1052,1055
ElectronConfiguration/1013
Enter/944,2206
Entropy/992
Epilog/1053
ErrorBar/1053
Eth/871
Faber/1070
falsi/970
fors/882
Fortran/1012
FunctionCompile/939,940,941,942
Gabor/992,1558,2361
Gell/878
GeometricMean/992
gesh/882
Gradient/992,1744
Green/575,1053,1368,1782,2397
HarmonicMean/992
hebdo/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1793,1794,1879,1880,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
hella/169,170,338,339,377,380,384,385,544,545,965,966,1091,1092,1168,1169,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
heptomino/882
Horizontal/1012,1066,2011
Horner/1012
Interpretation/352,363,1053
Kalman/884,992
kish/882
Kurtosis/931
lacta/169,170,174,206,338,339,377,380,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1793,1794,1879,1880,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
Laplacian/992,1068
LeastSquares/993
lenz/882
LibraryFunction/875,1302,1524,2305
LinearSolve/1053
mancus/882
MathML/1012,2201
Meijer/1061,1113
Mesh/397,398,400,401,402,404,405,406,408,409,410,530,1056,1853,1870,1890,1918,1919,1920,2049,2137
micri/169,170,174,206,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1793,1794,1879,1880,1883,1884,1994,2017,2018,2067,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
microinch/882
milim/882
MultivariateKurtosis/931
nanon/929,930,1994
Nearest/1053,1644,1646,2246
nonsquare/1036
NProduct/950,959
NSum/951,2196
omni/971
Opacity/1053,1057
Parent/352,395,501,645,1012
pekeis/882
Piecewise/935
Pink/874,1497
Play/960,1890
polyomino/882
Precedence/1012
Precision/1083,1186,2118
Quantile/1012,1816,1869
quetzal/882
quicki/174,206,495,496,963,964,1167,1170,1879,1880,1994,2349,2350,2355,2356
quincunx/882
Range/551,992,1431,1516,2103
Rational/1056,1338,1383,1994
saros/882
Savitzky/1084
slinch/882,952
StandardDeviation/992,1597
Stieltjes/1063
Subtract/1043,2066
Surd/1012
SurvivalModel/1000
Tab/991,1458,1459,1460,1461,1462,1464,1465,1467,1477,1481,1485,1486,1487,1488,2099,2342,2343,2344
tetromino/882
TeX/1012,2000,2095
Toggle/961
TotalVariation/992
Using/1048
VertexShape/1053
Vertical/309,1012,1066,1811,2032,2084,2230
viss/882
Wang/870
weko/169,170,174,206,384,385,495,496,544,545,573,574,963,964,965,966,1091,1092,1167,1168,1169,1170,1171,1401,1402,1417,1418,1518,1520,1531,1532,1533,1586,1587,1654,1656,1714,1715,1793,1794,1879,1880,1883,1884,1994,2017,2018,2067,2124,2125,2197,2198,2347,2348,2349,2350,2355,2356,2358,2359,2363,2364
$Display/1053
$Input/989,2131
$Output/1020,2079,2131
$Pre/967,1316,1854,1906
$SoundDisplay/1053
